Washington statutes.
RCW 39.59.040

Authorized investments—Bonds, warrants, certificates, and other investments.

Any local government in the state of Washington may invest in:

(1) Bonds of the state of Washington and any local government in the state of Washington;

(2) General obligation bonds of a state and general obligation bonds of a local government of a state, which bonds have at the time of investment one of the three highest credit ratings of a nationally recognized rating agency;

(3) Subject to compliance with RCW 39.56.030, registered warrants of a local government in the same county as the government making the investment;

(4) Certificates, notes, or bonds of the United States, or other obligations of the United States or its agencies, or of any corporation wholly owned by the government of the United States; or United States dollar denominated bonds, notes, or other obligations that are issued or guaranteed by supranational institutions, provided that, at the time of investment, the institution has the United States government as its largest shareholder;

(5) Federal home loan bank notes and bonds, federal land bank bonds and federal national mortgage association notes, debentures and guaranteed certificates of participation, or the obligations of any other government sponsored corporation whose obligations are or may become eligible as collateral for advances to member banks as determined by the board of governors of the federal reserve system;

(6) Bankers' acceptances purchased on the secondary market;

(7) Commercial paper purchased in the secondary market, provided that any local government of the state of Washington that invests in such commercial paper must adhere to the investment policies and procedures adopted by the state investment board; and

(8) Corporate notes purchased on the secondary market, provided that any local government of the state of Washington that invests in such notes must adhere to the investment policies and procedures adopted by the state investment board.

[ 2016 c 152 s 11.]